New Jersey, session 222, S1297.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Higher Education Student Assistance Authority shall administer a scholarship program for graduate students and postdoctoral researchers studying or conducting research in the State in the fields of plasma physics and fusion energy science.  The goal of the program shall be to support the education and career development of scholars who seek to advance the science and innovations needed to realize fusion as a safe, economical, and environmentally attractive energy source for the worlds long-term energy needs.  Under the program, the authority shall award ten scholarships annually in the amount of $12,500 each to qualified recipients enrolled in or employed by an institution of higher education in the State. b.    In order to be eligible for the scholarship, a candidate shall submit an application to the authority, including a written commitment from the institution of higher education at which the candidate is enrolled or employed to match the scholarship in the event the candidate is selected to receive one.  A candidate shall also submit a written statement to the authority, detailing the candidates ongoing commitment to the fields of plasma physics and fusion energy science.  The authority shall appoint a three-member selection committee, to review scholarship applications and make final determinations on scholarship awards. Members of the selection committee shall be selected based on their academic expertise in the field of plasma physics and fusion energy science. c.    Each scholarship awarded under this act shall be contingent upon the recipient receiving an equal scholarship from the institution of higher education at which the scholar recipient is enrolled or employed, and remaining in good standing at the institution. d.    There shall be annually appropriated to the Higher Education Student Assistance Authority $125,000 for the purposes of this act. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the 2023-2024 academic year.